Utah statutes.
17-33-5.   Office of personnel management -- Director -- Appointment and
responsibilities -- Personnel rules.
(1) (a) (i)  Each county executive shall:
(A)  create an office of personnel management, administered by a director of
personnel management; and
(B)  ensure that the director is a person with proven experience in personnel
management.
(ii)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), the position of director of
personnel management shall be:
(A)  a merit position; and
(B)  filled as provided in Subsection (1)(a)(iii).
(iii)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), the career service council
shall:
(A)  advertise and recruit for the director position in the same manner as for
merit positions;
(B)  select three names from a register; and
(C)  submit those names as recommendations to the county legislative body.
(iv)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), the county legislative body
shall select a person to serve as director of the office of personnel
management from the names submitted to it by the career service council.
(b) (i)  Effective for appointments made after May 1, 2006, and as an
alternative to the procedure under Subsections (1)(a)(ii), (iii), and (iv) and
at the county executive's discretion, the county executive may appoint a
director of personnel management with the advice and consent of the county
legislative body.
(ii)  The position of each director of personnel management appointed under
this Subsection (1)(b) shall be a merit exempt position.
(iii)  A director of personnel management appointed under this Subsection
(1)(b) may be terminated by the county executive with the consent of the
county legislative body.
(2)  The director of personnel management shall:
(a)  encourage and exercise leadership in the development of expertise in
personnel administration within the several departments, offices, and agencies
in the county service and make available the facilities of the office of
personnel management to this end;
(b)  advise the county legislative and executive bodies on the use of human
resources;
(c)  develop and implement programs for the improvement of employee
effectiveness, such as training, safety, health, counseling, and welfare;
(d)  investigate periodically the operation and effect of this law and of the
policies made under it and report findings and recommendations to the county
legislative body;
(e)  establish and maintain records of all employees in the county service,
setting forth as to each employee class, title, pay or status, and other
relevant data;
(f)  make an annual report to the county legislative body and county executive
regarding the work of the department; and
(g)  apply and carry out this law and the policies under it and perform any
other lawful acts that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this law.
(3) (a) (i)  The director shall recommend personnel rules for the county.
(ii)  The county legislative body may:
(A)  recommend personnel rules for the county; and
(B)  approve, amend, or reject personnel rules before they are adopted.
(b)  The rules shall provide for:
(i)  recruiting efforts to be planned and carried out in a manner that assures
open competition, with special emphasis to be placed on recruiting efforts to
attract minorities, women, persons with a disability as defined by and covered
under the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. 12102, or other
groups that are substantially underrepresented in the county work force to
help assure they will be among the candidates from whom appointments are made;
(ii)  the establishment of job related minimum requirements wherever
practical, that all successful candidates shall be required to meet in order
to be eligible for consideration for appointment or promotion;
(iii)  selection procedures that include consideration of the relative merit
of each applicant for employment, a job related method of determining the
eligibility or ineligibility of each applicant, and a valid, reliable, and
objective system of ranking eligible applicants according to their
qualifications and merit;
(iv)  certification procedures that insure equitable consideration of an
appropriate number of the most qualified eligible applicants based on the
ranking system;
(v)  appointments to positions in the career service by selection from the
most qualified eligible applicants certified on eligible lists established in
accordance with Subsections (3)(b)(iii) and (iv);
(vi)  noncompetitive appointments in the occasional instance where there is
evidence that open or limited competition is not practical, such as for
unskilled positions that have no minimum job requirements;
(vii)  limitation of competitions at the discretion of the director for
appropriate positions to facilitate employment of qualified applicants with a
substantial physical or mental impairment, or other groups protected by Title
VII of the Civil Rights Act;
(viii)  permanent appointment for entry to the career service that shall be
contingent upon satisfactory performance by the employee during a period of
six months, with the probationary period extendable for a period not to exceed
six months for good cause, but with the condition that the probationary
employee may appeal directly to the council any undue prolongation of the
period designed to thwart merit principles;
(ix)  temporary, provisional, or other noncareer service appointments, which
may not be used as a way of defeating the purpose of the career service and
may not exceed 270 days;
(x)  lists of eligible applicants normally to be used, if available, for
filling temporary positions, and short term emergency appointments to be made
without regard to the other provisions of law to provide for maintenance of
essential services in an emergency situation where normal procedures are not
practical, these emergency appointments not to exceed 270 days;
(xi)  promotion and career ladder advancement of employees to higher level
positions and assurance that all persons promoted are qualified for the
position;
(xii)  recognition of the equivalency of other merit processes by waiving, at
the discretion of the director, the open competitive examination for placement
in the career service positions of those who were originally selected through
a competitive examination process in another governmental entity, the
individual in those cases, to serve a probationary period;
(xiii)  preparation, maintenance, and revision of a position classification
plan for all positions in the career service, based upon similarity of duties
performed and responsibilities assumed, so that the same qualifications may
reasonably be required for, and the same schedule of pay may be equitably
applied to, all positions in the same class, the compensation plan, in order
to maintain a high quality public work force, to take into account the
responsibility and difficulty of the work, the comparative pay and benefits
needed to compete in the labor market and to stay in proper alignment with
other similar governmental units, and other factors;
(xiv)  keeping records of performance on all employees in the career service
and requiring consideration of performance records in determining salary
increases, any benefits for meritorious service, promotions, the order of
layoffs and reinstatements, demotions, discharges, and transfers;
(xv)  establishment of a plan governing layoffs resulting from lack of funds
or work, abolition of positions, or material changes in duties or
organization, and governing reemployment of persons so laid off, taking into
account with regard to layoffs and reemployment the relative ability,
seniority, and merit of each employee;
(xvi)  establishment of a plan for resolving employee grievances and
complaints with final and binding decisions;
(xvii)  establishment of disciplinary measures such as suspension, demotion in
rank or grade, or discharge, measures to provide for presentation of charges,
hearing rights, and appeals for all permanent employees in the career service
to the career service council;
(xviii)  establishment of a procedure for employee development and improvement
of poor performance;
(xix)  establishment of hours of work, holidays, and attendance requirements
in various classes of positions in the career service;
(xx)  establishment and publicizing of fringe benefits such as insurance,
retirement, and leave programs; and
(xxi)  any other requirements not inconsistent with this law that are proper
for its enforcement.
